District of Columbia statutes.
38-2651

State Board of Education; establishment; membership.

(a)

(1)

There is established a State Board of Education (“Board”) consisting of 9 members. Four members shall be appointed by the Mayor and confirmed by the Council. Five members shall be elected. Four of the 5 elected members shall be elected from the 4 school districts created pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. One member shall be elected at-large as the President of the Board.

(2)

Upon the repeal of §§ 1-204.52 and 1-204.95, the members of the Board of Education established pursuant to § 1-204.95 shall serve as the initial State Board of Education established by this chapter until noon, January 2, 2009.

(b)

Beginning at 12:01 p.m. on January 2, 2009, the Board shall consist of 9 elected members. One member shall be elected from each of the 8 school election wards created pursuant to § 1-1011.01 and one member shall be elected at-large. The Board shall select its president from among the 9 members of the Board.

(c)

The 4 school districts for the election of Board members, as described in subsection (a)(1) of this section, shall be comprised of the 8 election wards created pursuant to § 1-1011.01:

(1)

Wards 1 and 2 shall comprise School District I;

(2)

Wards 3 and 4 shall comprise School District II;

(3)

Wards 5 and 6 shall comprise School District III; and

(4)

Wards 7 and 8 shall comprise School District IV.

(d)

(1)

Except as provided in paragraph (3)(B) of this subsection, the term of office of a member of the Board, including the at-large member, shall be 4 years.

(2)

Members may receive compensation at a rate fixed by the Council, which shall not exceed the amount provided for in § 1-611.10.

(3)

(A)

The term of office of a member elected in a general election shall commence at 12:01 p.m. on January 2 of the year following the election. The term of office of an incumbent member shall expire at noon, January 2 of the year following the general election.

(B)

The initial terms of the members of the Board elected in the general election in November 2008 shall be as follows:

(i)

The 4 members elected from Wards 1, 3, 5, and 6 shall serve 2- year terms, ending at noon, January 2, 2011.

(ii)

The 4 members elected from Wards 2, 4, 7, and 8 and the member elected at-large shall serve 4-year terms, ending at noon, January 2, 2013.

(e)

(1)

Each member of the Board, including the at-large member, shall:

(A)

Be a qualified elector, as that term is defined in § 1-1001.02, in the school election ward from which he seeks election;

(B)

Have resided in the ward from which he or she is nominated for one year immediately preceding the election;

(C)

Not hold another elective office, other than delegate or alternate delegate to a convention of a political party nominating candidates for President and Vice-President of the United States; or

(D)

Not be an officer or employee of the District of Columbia government or of the Board.

(2)

A member shall forfeit his or her office upon failure to maintain the requirements of this subsection.

(f)

The election of the members of the Board shall be conducted on a nonpartisan basis and in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 10 of Title 1 [§ 1-1001.01 et seq.].

(g)

If a member of the Board dies, resigns, or otherwise becomes unable to serve or a member-elect fails to take office, the vacancy shall be filled as provided in § 1-1001.10(e) and (g).

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 402, 54 DCR 4102
Applicability: Section 404 of Law 17-9 provided that this title shall apply upon Congressional enactment of Title IX. Congress enacted the provisions of Title IX in Pub. L. 110-33, approved June 1, 2007.